Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,293
Time for bringing action; limitation.

Notwithstanding
any other provisions of law, any action to recover damages under the Exploited
Children's Civil Remedy Act shall be filed within three years after the later
of:

(1)
The conclusion of any related criminal prosecution against the person or persons
from whom recovery is sought;

(2) The receipt of actual or constructive
notice sent or given to the participant or portrayed observer or his or her
parent or legal guardian by a member of a law enforcement entity informing
the participant or portrayed observer or his or her parent or legal guardian
that the entity has identified the person:

(a) Who created, distributed, or actively
acquired the visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct containing the
participant or portrayed observer; or

(b) Who aided or assisted another person
with the creation, distribution, or active acquisition of the visual depiction
of sexually explicit conduct containing the participant or portrayed observer;
or

(3) The participant or portrayed observer reaching the age of eighteen
years.

Laws 2010, LB728, § 4.